Washington statutes.
RCW 24.20.030

Powers—Not subject to license fees.

Such lodge or other society shall be a body politic and corporate with all the powers and incidents of a corporation upon its compliance with RCW 24.20.010 and 24.20.020: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such fraternal corporation shall not be subject to any license fee or other corporate tax of commercial corporations.

[ 1903 c 80 s 3; RRS s 3867.]